Virginia statutes. Title 43. Mechanics’ and Certain Other Liens.
Chapter 1. Mechanics’ and Materialmen’s Liens.
§ 43-8.
Sufficiency of memorandum, affidavit and notice required by § 43-7.

The memorandum, affidavit and notice required by §

43-7

shall be sufficient if substantially in form and effect as follows:

Memorandum for Mechanic’s Lien Claimed by Subcontractor. Name of owner: Address of owner: Name of general contractor (if any): Name of claimant: Address of claimant: Contractor license or certificate number of claimant (if applicable): Issuance date of license or certificate (if applicable): Expiration date of license or certificate (if applicable): If no contractor license or certificate number is included, the claimant certifies that such a valid license or certificate is not required by law for the work done for which the benefit of a lien is claimed. 1. Type of materials or services furnished: 2. Amount claimed: $
If any part of the Amount claimed is not due as of the date of this mechanic’s lien, identify the date or event upon which it will be due and the sum(s) to which the due date(s) or event(s) apply: 3. Type of structure on which work done or materials furnished: 4. Brief description and location of real property: 5. Date from which interest on above amount is claimed: Date: It is the intent of the claimant to claim the benefit of a lien. (Name of claimant). Affidavit. State of Virginia, County (or city) of to wit: I, (notary or other officer) for the county (or city) aforesaid, do certify that , claimant, or , agent for claimant, this day made oath before me in my county (or city) aforesaid that is justly indebted to claimant in the sum of dollars, for the consideration stated in the foregoing memorandum, and that the same is payable as therein stated. Given under my hand this the day of , 20. (Notary Public or
Magistrate, et cetera.) Notice. To (owner). You are hereby notified that (general contractor) is indebted to me in the sum of dollars ($) with interest thereon from the day of , 20, for work done (or materials furnished, as the case may be,) in and about the construction (or removal, etc.,) of a (describe structure, whether dwelling, store, or etc.,) which he has contracted to construct (or remove, etc.,) for you or on property owned by you in the county (or city) of , and that I have duly recorded a mechanic’s lien for the same. Given under my hand this the day of , 20. (Subcontractor).

Click to view

History.

Code 1919, § 6428; 1968, c. 568; 2007, c. 504; 2013, c. 293; 2019, c. 243.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 504 inserted “It is the intent of the claimant to claim the benefit of a lien” following Item 5.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 293 added the language beginning “Contractor license or certificate number of claimant” and ending “which the benefit of a lien is claimed” preceding item 1.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 243 inserted the second paragraph of subdivision 2.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia practice and pleading for the year 1975-1976, see 62 Va. L. Rev. 1460 (1976).

For survey on creditors’ rights in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 561 (1989).

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 6-506 Memorandum for Mechanic’s Lien by Subcontractor.

§ 43-9.
Perfection of lien by person performing labor or furnishing materials for a subcontractor; extent of lien.

Any person performing labor or furnishing materials for a subcontractor, in order to perfect the lien given him by §

43-3

, shall comply with the provisions of §

43-4

, and in addition thereto give notice in writing to the owner of the property, or his agent, and to the general contractor, or his agent, of the amount and character of his claim. But the amount for which a lien may be perfected by such person shall not exceed the amount for which such subcontractor could himself claim a lien under §

43-7

.

History.

Code 1919, § 6429.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia commercial law for the year 1970-1971, see 57 Va. L. Rev. 1527 (1971).

for the year 1975-1976, see 62 Va. L. Rev. 1375 (1976).

For survey of Virginia practice and pleading for the year 1975-1976, see 62 Va. L. Rev. 1460 (1976).

For survey of Virginia commercial law for the year 1977-1978, see 64 Va. L. Rev. 1383 (1978).

For review of judicial decisions of significance in Virginia affecting construction law, see
43 U. Rich. L. Rev. 107 (2008).

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 6-508 Memorandum for Mechanic’s Lien by Sub-subcontractor; No. 6-509 Memorandum for Mechanic’s Lien by Sub-Subcontractor — Preprinted Form.

§ 43-10.
Sufficiency of memorandum, affidavit and notice required by § 43-9.

The memorandum, affidavit and notice required by §

43-9

shall be sufficient if substantially in form and effect as follows:

Memorandum for Mechanic’s Lien Claimed by Sub-subcontractor. Name of owner: Address of owner: Name of general contractor (if any) and subcontractor: Name of claimant: Address of claimant: Contractor license or certificate number of claimant (if applicable): Issuance date of license or certificate (if applicable): Expiration date of license or certificate (if applicable): If no contractor license or certificate number is included, the claimant certifies that such a valid license or certificate is not required by law for the work done for which the benefit of a lien is claimed. 1. Type of materials or services furnished: 2. Amount claimed: $ If any part of the Amount claimed is not due as of the date of this mechanic’s lien, identify the date or event upon which it will be due, and the sum(s) to which the due date(s) or event(s) apply: 3. Type of structure on which work done or materials furnished: 4. Brief description and location of real property: 5. Date from which interest on above amount is claimed: Date: It is the intent of the claimant to claim the benefit of a lien. (Name of claimant). (Signature of claimant or agent for claimant). Affidavit. State of Virginia, County (or city) of , to wit: I, (notary or other officer) for the county (or city) aforesaid do certify that claimant, or , agent for claimant, this day made oath before me in my county (or city) aforesaid that is justly indebted to claimant in the sum of dollars for the consideration stated in the foregoing memorandum, and that the same is payable as therein stated. Given under my hand this the . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . day of . . . . . . . . . . . . . . ., 20. . . . (Notary Public or
Magistrate, et cetera.)
Notice. To (owner) and (general contractor): You are hereby notified that , a subcontractor under you, said (general contractor) for the construction (or removal, etc.,) of a (describe structure) for you, or on property owned by you, said (owner) is indebted to me in the sum of . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . dollars ($ ) with interest thereon from the . . . . day of . . . . . . ., 20. . ., for work done (or materials furnished) in and about the construction (or removal, etc.,) of (naming structure), situate in the county (or city) of Virginia, and that I have duly recorded a mechanic’s lien for the same. Given under my hand this the . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . day of . . . . . . . . . . . . . . ., 20. . . . . . . (Sub-subcontractor).

Click to view

History.

Code 1919, § 6429; 1968, c. 568; 1984, c. 647; 2007, c. 504; 2013, c. 293; 2019, c. 243.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 504 inserted “It is the intent of the claimant to claim the benefit of a lien” following Item 5.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 293 added the language beginning “Contractor license or certificate number of claimant” and ending “which the benefit of a lien is claimed” preceding item 1.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 243 inserted the second paragraph of subdivision 2.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia practice and pleading for the year 1975-1976, see 62 Va. L. Rev. 1460 (1976).

For survey on creditors’ rights in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 561 (1989).

§ 43-11.
How owner or general contractor made personally liable to subcontractor, laborer or materialman.

Any subcontractor or person furnishing labor or material to the general contractor or subcontractor, may give a preliminary notice in writing to the owner or his agent or the general contractor, stating the nature and character of his contract and the probable amount of his claim.

Additionally, if such subcontractor, or person furnishing labor or material shall at any time after the work is done or material furnished by him and before the expiration of thirty days from the time such building or structure is completed or the work thereon otherwise terminated furnish the owner thereof or his agent and also the general contractor, or the general contractor alone in case he is the only one notified, with a second notice stating a correct account, verified by affidavit, of his actual claim against the general contractor or subcontractor, for work done or materials furnished and of the amount due, then the owner, or the general contractor, if he alone was notified, shall be personally liable to the claimant for the actual amount due to the subcontractor or persons furnishing labor or material by the general contractor or subcontractor, provided the same does not exceed the sum in which the owner is indebted to the general contractor at the time the second notice is given or may thereafter become indebted by virtue of his contract with the general contractor, or in case the general contractor alone is notified the sum in which he is indebted to the subcontractor at the time the second notice is given or may thereafter become indebted by virtue of his contract with the general contractor. But the amount which a person supplying labor or material to a subcontractor can claim shall not exceed the amount for which such subcontractor could file his claim.

Any bona fide agreement for deductions by the owner because of the failure or refusal of the general contractor to comply with his contract shall be binding upon such subcontractor, laborer or materialman.

The provisions of this section are subject to the qualification that before any such personal liability of the owner or general contractor herein provided for shall be binding the two notices herein required, with such returns thereon as is sufficient under §

8.01-325

, shall be recorded and indexed as provided in §

43-4.1

in the appropriate clerk’s office; or the two notices herein required shall be mailed by registered or certified mail to and received by the owner or general contractor upon whom personal liability is sought to be imposed, and a return receipt therefor showing delivery to the addressee shall be prima facie evidence of receipt.

History.

1924, p. 658; Michie Code 1942, § 6429a; 1968, c. 568; 2002, c. 772.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 772 inserted the subdivision 1 to 4 designations; in subdivision 1, inserted “a preliminary” preceding “notice,” and deleted “and” at the end; in the first sentence of subdivision 2, inserted “Additionally” at the beginning, inserted “a second notice stating” preceding “a correct account,” inserted “actual” preceding “claim against,” inserted “then” preceding “the owner, or the general contractor,” inserted “actual” preceding “amount due,” and twice inserted “second” preceding “notice”; and in subdivision 4, twice substituted “two notices” for “notice,” and substituted “returns” for “return” preceding “thereon.”

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia commercial law for the year 1975-1976, see 62 Va. L. Rev. 1375 (1976).

For article reviewing case law and changes in legislation affecting Virginia construction law, see 40 U. Rich. L. Rev. 143 (2005).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3A M.J. Building Contracts, § 20.

§ 43-12.
Repealed by Acts 1968, c. 568.

§ 43-13.
Funds paid to general contractor or subcontractor must be used to pay persons performing labor or furnishing material.

Any contractor or subcontractor or any officer, director or employee of such contractor or subcontractor who shall, with intent to defraud, retain or use the funds, or any part thereof, paid by the owner or his agent, the contractor, or the lender to such contractor or by the owner or his agent, the contractor, or the lender to a subcontractor under any contract for the construction, removal, repair, or improvement of any building or structure permanently annexed to the freehold for any other purpose than to pay persons performing labor upon or furnishing material for such construction, repair, removal, or improvement is guilty of larceny in appropriating such funds for any other use while any amount for which the contractor or subcontractor may be liable or become liable under his contract for such labor or materials remains unpaid and may be prosecuted upon complaint of any person or persons who have not been fully paid any amount due them.

The use by any such contractor or subcontractor or any officer, director, or employee of such contractor or subcontractor of any moneys paid under the contract before paying all amounts due or to become due for labor performed or material furnished for such building or structure for any other purpose than paying such amounts due on the project shall be prima facie evidence of intent to defraud. Any breach or violation of this section may give rise to a civil cause of action for a party in contract with the general contractor or subcontractor, as appropriate; however, this right does not affect a contractor’s or subcontractor’s right to withhold payment for failure to properly perform labor or furnish materials on the project. Any contract or subcontract provision that allows a contracting party to withhold funds due under one contract or subcontract for alleged claims or damages due on another contract or subcontract is void as against public policy.

History.

1932, p. 483; Michie Code 1942, § 6429b; 1968, c. 568; 1980, c. 390; 1982, c. 391; 1992, c. 713; 1998, c. 754; 2020, c. 873.

The 1998 amendment,

in the first paragraph, substituted “contractor or subcontractor” for “contractor, subcontractor” in three places, deleted “or owner-developer, as defined in §

54.1-1100

” preceding “or any officer,” and deleted “or owner-developer” preceding “who shall, with intent,” deleted “or owner-developer” preceding “or by the owner,” deleted “or owner developer” preceding “may be liable”; and in the second paragraph, substituted “contractor or subcontractor” for “contractor, subcontractor” in two places, and deleted “or owner-developer” following “contractor or subcontractor” in two places.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by c. 873, in the first paragraph, substituted “the lender” for “lender” twice and “is guilty” for “shall be guilty”; in the second paragraph, inserted “due on the project” and added the last two sentences; and made stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia commercial law for the year 1975-1976, see 62 Va. L. Rev. 1375 (1976).

For article, “Construction Law,” see 45 U. Rich. L. Rev. 227 (2010).

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 16-4007 Owner’s and Contractor’s Affidavit and Waiver and Release of Liens for Construction in Progress; Nos. 16-4008 et seq.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

2B M.J. Bankruptcy, §§ 132, 135.

§ 43-13.1.
Use of lien waiver form; forgery or signing without authority.

Any person who knowingly presents a waiver of lien form to an owner, his agent, contractor, lender, or title company for the purpose of obtaining funds or title insurance and who forges or signs without authority the name of any person listed thereon shall be guilty of a felony and punished as provided in §

18.2-172

.

History.

1968, c. 568.

§ 43-13.2.
When an affidavit or a signed statement of payment required of owner prior to sale.

A person who is both the owner of a one- or two-family residential dwelling unit and either a developer of such property, a contractor in connection with the development or improvement of such property or a contractor or subcontractor furnishing labor or material in connection with the development or improvement of such property shall, at the time of settlement on the sale of such property, provide the purchaser with an affidavit or a signed statement attested to by a witness stating either (i) that all persons performing labor or furnishing materials in connection with the improvements on such property and with whom such owner is in privity of contract have been paid in full or (ii) the name, address and amount payable or claimed to be payable to any person so performing labor or furnishing materials and with whom such owner is in privity of contract. Willful failure to provide such statement or any willful material misrepresentation with respect to such a statement which causes a monetary loss to a financial institution, title company, contractor, subcontractor, supplier, owner, mechanics’ lien agent or any other person or institution shall be punishable as a Class 5 felony.

History.

1992, cc. 779, 787; 2003, c. 400.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 5 felonies, see §

18.2-10

.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 400 inserted “or a signed statement attested to by a witness” in the first sentence.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 16- 4012 Owner’s Affidavit and Indemnity for Posted Project.

§ 43-13.3.
An affidavit or a signed statement of payment required of owner prior to sale or refinance; penalty.

Any person who is the owner of a one- or two-family residential dwelling unit not included within the scope of §

43-13.2

shall, at the time of settlement on the sale of such property, provide the purchaser, or lender in the case of a permanent loan or refinance, with an affidavit or a signed statement attested to by a witness stating either (i) that all persons performing labor or furnishing materials in connection with any improvements on such property within 120 days prior to the date of settlement and with whom such owner is in privity of contract have been paid in full, or (ii) the name, address and amount payable or claimed to be payable to any person so performing labor or furnishing materials and with whom such owner is in privity of contract. Any willful material misrepresentation in the affidavit or signed statement attested to by a witness which causes a monetary loss to any financial institution, title company, or purchaser shall be punishable as a Class 3 misdemeanor.

History.

1994, c. 388; 2003, c. 400.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 3 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 400, in the first sentence, deleted “family” following “one-,” and inserted “or a signed statement attested to by a witness”; and inserted “or signed statement attested to by a witness” in the last sentence.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 16-4014 Owner’s Affidavit as to Mechanic’s Liens and Possession (123-Day Letter); No. 16-4016 Owner’s Affidavit Pursuant to §

43-13.3

.

§ 43-14.
Repealed by Acts 1968, c. 568.

§ 43-14.1.
Service of notices.

Any notice authorized or required by this chapter, except the notice required by §

43-11

, may be served by any sheriff or constable who shall make return of the time and manner of service; or any such notice may be served by certified or registered mail and a return receipt therefor shall be prima facie evidence of receipt.

History.

1968, c. 568; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 155.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 6-506 Memorandum for Mechanic’s Lien by Subcontractor.

§ 43-15.
Inaccuracies in memorandum or description not affecting lien.

No inaccuracy in the memorandum filed, or in the description of the property to be covered by the lien, shall invalidate the lien, if the property can be reasonably identified by the description given and the memorandum conforms substantially to the requirements of §§

43-5

,

43-8

and

43-10

, respectively, and is not wilfully false.

History.

Code 1919, § 6431.

Law Review.

For article on title examination in Virginia, see 17 U. Rich. L. Rev. 229 (1983).

For article reviewing case law and changes in legislation affecting Virginia construction law, see 40 U. Rich. L. Rev. 143 (2005).

For article, “Construction Law,” see 45 U. Rich. L. Rev. 227 (2010).

§ 43-16.
What owner may do when contractor fails or refuses to complete building, etc.

If the owner is compelled to complete his building, structure, or railroad, or any part thereof undertaken by a general contractor in consequence of the failure or refusal of the general contractor to do so, the amount expended by the owner for such completion shall have priority over all mechanics’ liens which have been or may be placed on such building, structure, or railroad by such general contractor, a subcontractor under him, or any person furnishing labor or materials to either of them.

History.

Code 1919, § 6432.

§ 43-17.
Limitation on suit to enforce lien.

No suit to enforce any lien perfected under §§

43-4

,

43-5

and

43-7

to

43-10

shall be brought after six months from the time when the memorandum of lien was recorded or after sixty days from the time the building, structure or railroad was completed or the work thereon otherwise terminated, whichever time shall last occur; provided, however, that the filing of a petition to enforce any such lien in any suit wherein such petition may be properly filed shall be regarded as the institution of a suit under this section; and, provided further, that nothing herein shall extend the time within which such lien may be perfected.

History.

Code 1919, § 6433; 1926, p. 43; 1956, c. 399.

Cross references.

As to limitation of actions generally, see §§

8.01-228

through

8.01-256

.

§ 43-17.1.
Hearing on validity of lien.

Any party, having an interest in real property against which a lien has been filed, may, upon a showing of good cause, petition the court of equity having jurisdiction wherein the building, structure, other property, or railroad is located to hold a hearing to determine the validity of any perfected lien on the property. After reasonable notice to the lien claimant and any party to whom the benefit of the lien would inure and who has given notice as provided in §

43-18

of the Code of Virginia, the court shall hold a hearing and determine the validity of the lien. If the court finds that the lien is invalid, it shall forthwith order that the memorandum or notice of lien be released from record.

History.

1975, c. 380; 2010, c. 352.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 352 substituted “released from record” for “removed from record” at the end of the last sentence.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 6-504 Memorandum for Mechanic’s Lien by General Contractor; No. 6-506 Memorandum for Mechanic’s Lien by Subcontractor; No. 6-507 Memorandum for Mechanic’s Lien by Subcontractor — Preprinted Form.

§ 43-18.
Lien of general contractor to inure to benefit of subcontractor.

The perfected lien of a general contractor on any building or structure shall inure to the benefit of any subcontractor, and of any person performing labor or furnishing materials to a subcontractor who has not perfected a lien on such building or structure, provided such subcontractor, or person performing labor or furnishing materials shall give written notice of his claim against the general contractor, or subcontractor, as the case may be, to the owner or his agent before the amount of such lien is actually paid off or discharged.

History.

Code 1919, § 6434.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia commercial law for the year 1974-1975, see 61 Va. L. Rev. 1668 (1975).

For survey on creditors’ rights in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 561 (1989).

§ 43-19.
Validity and priority of lien not affected by assignments.

Every assignment or transfer by a general contractor, in whole or in part, of his contract with the owner or of any money or consideration coming to him under such contract, or by a subcontractor of his contract with the general contractor, in whole or in part, or of any money or consideration coming to him under his contract with the general contractor, and every writ of fieri facias, attachment or other process against the general contractor or subcontractor to subject or encumber his interest arising under such contract, shall be subject to the liens given by this chapter to laborers, mechanics, and materialmen. No such assignment or transfer shall in any way affect the validity or the priority of satisfaction of liens given by this chapter.

History.

Code 1919, § 6435.

Cross references.

As to priority of mechanics’ lien generally, see §§

43-20

and

43-21

, and notes thereto.

As to assignment of supply and labor liens, see also §

43-26

.

§ 43-20.
Extent of lien where owner has less than fee in land.

Subject to the provisions of §

43-3

, if the person who shall cause a building or structure to be erected or repaired owns less than a fee simple estate in the land, then only his interest therein shall be subject to liens created under this chapter. When the vendee under a contract for the sale of real estate causes a building or structure to be erected or repaired on the land which is the subject of the contract and the owner has actual knowledge of such erection or repairs, the interest of the owner in the land shall be subject to liens created under this chapter; and for the purposes of §

43-21

, the interest of such an owner in the land, to the extent of the unpaid purchase price, shall be deemed to be a recorded purchase money deed of trust lien created at the time the contract of sale was fully executed. As used in this section, “a contract for the sale of real estate” shall not include a lease of real estate containing an option to purchase the leased real estate or an option to purchase real estate unless the option is enforceable against the optionee.

History.

Code 1919, § 6436; 1924, p. 413; 1968, c. 568; 1980, c. 574.

Law Review.

For article on title examination in Virginia, see 17 U. Rich. L. Rev. 229 (1983).

For review of judicial decisions of significance in Virginia affecting construction law, see
43 U. Rich. L. Rev. 107 (2008).

§ 43-21.
Priorities between mechanics’ and other liens.

No lien or encumbrance upon the land created before the work was commenced or materials furnished shall operate upon the building or structure erected thereon, or materials furnished for and used in the same, until the lien in favor of the person doing the work or furnishing the materials shall have been satisfied; nor shall any lien or encumbrance upon the land created after the work was commenced or materials furnished operate on the land, or such building or structure, until the lien in favor of the person doing the work or furnishing the materials shall have been satisfied.

Unless otherwise provided in the subordination agreement, if the holder of the prior recorded lien of a purchase money deed of trust subordinates to the lien of a construction money deed of trust, such subordination shall be limited to the construction money deed of trust and said prior lien shall not be subordinate to mechanics’ and materialmen’s liens to the extent of the value of the land by virtue of such agreement.

In the enforcement of the liens acquired under the previous sections of this chapter, any lien or encumbrance created on the land before the work was commenced or materials furnished shall be preferred in the distribution of the proceeds of sale only to the extent of the value of the land estimated, exclusive of the buildings or structures, at the time of sale, and the residue of the proceeds of sale shall be applied to the satisfaction of the liens provided for in the previous sections of this chapter. Provided that liens filed for performing labor or furnishing materials for the repair or improvement of any building or structure shall be subject to any encumbrance against such land and building or structure of record prior to the commencement of the improvements or repairs or the furnishing of materials or supplies therefor. Nothing contained in the foregoing proviso shall apply to liens that may be filed for the construction or removal of any building or structure.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection C of §

43-3

, a general contractor may, prior to or after providing any labor, services, or materials, contract to subordinate his lien rights to prior recorded and later recorded deeds of trust, provided that such contract is (i) in writing and (ii) signed by any general contractor whose lien rights are subordinated pursuant to such contract.

History.

Code 1919, § 6436; 1924, p. 413; 1968, c. 568; 2018, cc. 79, 325.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 79 and 325 are identical, and added the fourth paragraph.

Law Review.

For article, “Virginia Mechanics’ Liens: A Precarious Priority,” see 21 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 235 (1964).

For survey of Virginia commercial law for the year 1970-71, see 57 Va. L. Rev. 1527 (1971).

For survey of Virginia law on business associations for the year 1970-1971, see 57 Va. L. Rev. 1541 (1971).

For survey of Virginia commercial law for the year 1975-1976, see 62 Va. L. Rev. 1375 (1976).

§ 43-22.
How liens enforced.

The liens created and perfected under this chapter may be enforced in a court of equity by a bill filed in the county or city wherein the building, structure, or railroad, or some part thereof is situated, or wherein the owner, or if there be more than one, any of them, resides. The plaintiff shall file with his bill an itemized statement of his account, showing the amount and character of the work done or materials furnished, the prices charged therefor, the payments made, if any, the balance due, and the time from which interest is claimed thereon, the correctness of which account shall be verified by the affidavit of himself, or his agent. When suit is brought for the enforcement of any such lien against the property bound thereby, all parties entitled to such liens upon the property or any portion thereof may file petitions in such suit asking for the enforcement of their respective liens to have the same effect as if an independent suit were brought by each claimant.

History.

Code 1919, § 6437; 1920, p. 485.

Cross references.

As to limitation on suits to enforce mechanics’ liens, see §

43-17

.

For rule of court on intervenors generally, see Rule 3:14.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia commercial law for the year 1970-1971, see 57 Va. L. Rev. 1527 (1971).

for the year 1975-1976, see 62 Va. L. Rev. 1375 (1976).

Research References.

Friend’s Virginia Pleading and Practice (Matthew Bender). Chapter 32 Juvenile and Domestic Relations Courts; Family Courts; Small Claims Courts; Commissioners in Chancery: Local Rules of Court. § 32.05 Commissioners in Chancery. Charles E. Friend.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 6-510 Complaint by General Contractor to Enforce Mechanic’s Lien; Nos. 6-511 et seq.

§ 43-23.
Priority among liens perfected under this chapter.

There shall be no priority among the liens created and perfected under this chapter, except that the lien of a subcontractor shall be preferred to that of his general contractor; the lien of persons performing labor or furnishing materials for a subcontractor, shall be preferred to that of such subcontractor; and liens filed by persons performing manual labor shall have priority over materialmen to the extent of the labor performed during the thirty days immediately preceding the date of the performance of the last labor.

History.

Code 1919, § 6437; 1920, p. 485.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

12A M.J. Liens, § 11.

§ 43-23.1.
Forfeiture of lien.

Any person who shall, with intent to mislead, include in his memorandum of lien work not performed upon, or materials not furnished for, the property described in his memorandum shall thereby forfeit any right to a lien under this chapter.

History.

1968, c. 568; 1976, c. 253.

§ 43-23.2.
Remedies cumulative.

The remedies afforded by this chapter shall be deemed cumulative in nature and not be construed to be in lieu of any other legal or equitable remedies.

History.

1968, c. 568.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3C M.J. Commercial Law, § 97.